New Mexico, session 2026, HB68.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Two million dollars ($2,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the workforce solutions department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for a health care recruitment program. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233125.1